California, session 20252026, AB296.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 8 (commencing with Section 52470) is added to Chapter 9 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: Article 8. Equipment Registry52470. (a) The department shall develop and maintain a registry of career technical education equipment that is listed for sale pursuant to subdivision (b) and shall make the registry accessible to local educational agencies via an internet website.(b) (1) A local educational agency that intends to offer for sale any career technical education equipment, including, but not limited to, power tools, table saws, simulators, medical equipment, drafting equipment, or auto diagnostic tools and vehicles, may list the equipment in the registry established by the department pursuant to subdivision (a). Only an employee of a local educational agency may list equipment for sale on the registry.(2) Equipment listed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be offered for sale to other local educational agencies and maintained in the registry for a period of no less than three months unless the equipment is purchased by a local educational agency.(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.52470.9. This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SECTION 1.Section 3074.2 of the Labor Code is amended to read:3074.2.(a)For the purposes of this section:(1)“Career fair” means an event where multiple private businesses, government agencies, university representatives, or career technical school representatives are invited by a school or school district to present career options or career technical education options for students.(2)“College fair” means an event where multiple college or university representatives are invited by a school or school district to present college options to students.(3)“School” means public schools, including, but not limited to, charter schools and alternative schools.(b)(1)A school district or school that is planning to hold a college or career fair shall notify each apprenticeship program in the same county as the school district or school of the college or career fair. If no apprenticeship program operates in the same county, the school district or school may notify an apprenticeship program in any county that shares a geographic border with the county where the school district or school is located. In determining the county location of an apprenticeship program, the school district or school shall rely on the database of approved apprenticeship programs published by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards on its internet website.(2)The notification shall include both of the following:(A)The planned date and time of the college fair or career fair.(B)The planned location of the college fair or career fair.(3)Notice shall be delivered before the planned date of the college or career fair either by first-class mail or by electronic mail pursuant to the contact information contained in the database of approved apprenticeship programs published by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards on its internet website.(c)(1)At least once during each school year, a school district or school shall host an apprenticeship fair event, in the style of college and career fair events, that is focused on local apprenticeship programs and career technical education opportunities.(2)The school district or school shall notify each apprenticeship program in the county of the school district or school about the apprenticeship fair using the requirements set forth in subdivision (b).(d)If the governing board of a school district requires the completion of community service hours as a requirement for graduation, the school district shall allow a student who attends a college fair, career fair, or apprenticeship fair the equivalent of one hour towards the community service hourly requirements per year. SEC. 2.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.